Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4412
Child welfare system; terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 43-4411 to 43-4416:

(1) Child welfare system means children and families receiving, and persons providing or effecting:

(a) In-home and out-of-home child welfare case management services;

(b) Physical and behavioral health care;

(c) Youth rehabilitation and treatment center services;

(d) Adoption or guardianship assistance services;

(e) Prevention services;

(f) Post-adoption or post-guardianship related services; and

(g) Public or private education and training services;

(2) Individual with lived experience in the child welfare system means an individual who has previously received services from the child welfare system, currently receives such services, or is at risk of needing such services and who has valuable insight to contribute;

(3) Practice and finance model means an evidence-based or evidence-informed approach to the practice and financing of the child welfare system across the State of Nebraska;

(4) Strategic leadership group means the child welfare strategic leadership group created in section 43-4414; and

(5) Work group means the child welfare practice model work group created in section 43-4413.

Laws 2022, LB1173, § 2.